Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB107.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 301.2. Payment.(a) Methods.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a licensed eligible organization may accept payment via credit card, debit card, mobile payment services or other electronic payment method for the playing of games of chance. 123456789101112131415161718192021 (2) A licensee under Chapter 9 may not accept mobile payment services for the playing of games of chance.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Mobile payment service." A service in which a money payment is made electronically through a money transfer service, such as Venmo, Paypal, Cash App or an equivalent money transfer service.Section 303.2. Online raffle sales.(a) Operations.--A licensed eligible organization may conduct and reveal the winner of raffles through a publicly accessible Internet website, social media platform or mobile application.(b) Payments.--A licensed eligible organization may accept electronic payment via credit card, debit card, mobile electronic payment application or other electronic payment method for the purchase of a raffle ticket, if all of the following apply:(1) The organization employs a method to detect the physical location of an individual who buys a ticket for the raffle, but the organization may not accept payment from an individual who is located outside of this Commonwealth.(2) The organization employs a method to verify that the individual who buys a raffle ticket is at least 18 years of age, but the organization may not accept payment from an individual under 18 years of age.(3) The organization does not violate the provisions of 31 U.S.C. Subt. IV Ch. 53 Subch. IV (relating to prohibition on funding of unlawful Internet gambling).(c) Applicability.--The following sections shall not apply 20250HB0107PN0085 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to online raffle sales:(1) Section 302.(2) Section 303(b).(3) Section 907.Section 2. The provisions of 61 Pa. Code § 901.506 are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 301.2 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0107PN0085 - 3 - 12345678